ch.aff
FLAG             long    # two-character affix identifiers
#=======================================================================================================================
# [B6] PREFIX - NEGATIVE PLURAL EXISTENTIAL MARKER  manai-, mannai-
#~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
# Definition: Negative Plural Existential marker  "there are no / there are none"
#=======================================================================================================================
PFX B6 Y 4
PFX B6 0 manai [^aeiou] EXIST.NEG.PL
PFX B6 0 mannai [^aeiou] EXIST.NEG.PL
PFX B6 0 manai' [aeiou] EXIST.NEG.PL
PFX B6 0 mannai' [aeiou] EXIST.NEG.PL


#=======================================================================================================================
# [B7] PREFIX - CAUSATIVE and PASSIVE VOICE  mana'-
#~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
# Definition: Combination causative and passive voice marker for Topping class II verbs
#=======================================================================================================================
PFX B7 Y 2
PFX B7 0 mi [^aeiou] HAVE_MANY_X
PFX B7 0 mi' [aeiou] HAVE_MANY_X


#=======================================================================================================================
# [B8] PREFIX - EXISTENTIAL CAUSATIVE  muna'-
#~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
# Definition:  That which makes it or causes it to be
#=======================================================================================================================
PFX B8 Y 1
PFX B8 0 muna' . CAUS_EXIST


#=======================================================================================================================
# [B9] PREFIX - EXISTENTIAL CAUSATIVE  numa'-
#~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
# Definition:  That which makes it or causes it to be
#=======================================================================================================================
PFX B9 Y 1
PFX B9 0 numa' . CAUS_EXIST


#=======================================================================================================================
# [BA] SUFFIX - LINKER  -n
#~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
# Definition:  A marker on the possessed/modified word; Topping-- excrescent consonant
#=======================================================================================================================
SFX BA Y 3
SFX BA 0 n/2 [aeiou] CS
SFX BA i en/2 . CS
SFX BA u on/2 . CS


#=======================================================================================================================
# [BB] SUFFIX - ABILITATIVE (APTATIVE)  -on, -yon
#~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
# Definition:  Capable of being X
#=======================================================================================================================
SFX BB Y 2
SFX BB 0 on [^aeiou] ABIL
SFX BB 0 yon [aeiou] ABIL


#=======================================================================================================================
# [BC] PREFIX - SIMILATIVE  tai-
#~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
# Definition:  Similar to or like X
#=======================================================================================================================
PFX BC Y 2
PFX BC 0 tai [^aeiou] SIM
PFX BC 0 tai' [aeiou] SIM


#=======================================================================================================================
# [BD] PREFIX - NEGATIVE POSSESSIVE  tái-
#~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
# Definition:  To not have, be without
#=======================================================================================================================
PFX BD Y 2
PFX BD 0 tái [^aeiou] NEG.POSS
PFX BD 0 tái' [aeiou] NEG.POSS


#=======================================================================================================================
# [BE] PREFIX - COMPARATIVE  tak-
#~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
# Definition:  Used for comparing location / direction words, triggers fronting
#=======================================================================================================================
PFX BE Y 76
PFX BE 0 tak . COMP		## will this over-generate? Need to force fronting... this might allow anything
PFX BE h takk [aei] COMP
PFX BE o take [^aeiou] COMP
PFX BE u taki [^aeiou] COMP
PFX BE bå takba [^aeiou] COMP
PFX BE bo takbe [^aeiou] COMP
PFX BE bu takbi [^aeiou] COMP
PFX BE blå takbla [^aeiou] COMP
PFX BE blu takbli [^aeiou] COMP
PFX BE brå takbra [^aeiou] COMP
PFX BE bro takbre [^aeiou] COMP
PFX BE bru takbri [^aeiou] COMP
PFX BE chå takcha [^aeiou] COMP
PFX BE cho takche [^aeiou] COMP
PFX BE chu takchi [^aeiou] COMP
PFX BE då takda [^aeiou] COMP
PFX BE do takde [^aeiou] COMP
PFX BE du takdi [^aeiou] COMP
PFX BE få takfa [^aeiou] COMP
PFX BE fo takfe [^aeiou] COMP
PFX BE fu takfi [^aeiou] COMP
PFX BE frå takfra [^aeiou] COMP
PFX BE fru takfri [^aeiou] COMP
PFX BE gå takga [^aeiou] COMP
PFX BE go takge [^aeiou] COMP
PFX BE gu takgi [^aeiou] COMP
PFX BE glo takgle [^aeiou] COMP
PFX BE grå takgra [^aeiou] COMP
PFX BE gru takgri [^aeiou] COMP
PFX BE hå takka [^aeiou] COMP
PFX BE ho takke [^aeiou] COMP
PFX BE hu takki [^aeiou] COMP
PFX BE hai takkai . COMP
PFX BE hao takkao . COMP
PFX BE hoe takkoe . COMP
PFX BE hou takkou . COMP
PFX BE hue takkue . COMP
PFX BE hui takkui . COMP
PFX BE kå takka [^aeiou] COMP
PFX BE ko takke [^aeiou] COMP
PFX BE ku takki [^aeiou] COMP
PFX BE klå takkla [^aeiou] COMP
PFX BE kru takkri [^aeiou] COMP
PFX BE lå takla [^aeiou] COMP
PFX BE lo takle [^aeiou] COMP
PFX BE lu takli [^aeiou] COMP
PFX BE må takma [^aeiou] COMP
PFX BE mo takme [^aeiou] COMP
PFX BE mu takmi [^aeiou] COMP
PFX BE nå takna [^aeiou] COMP
PFX BE no takne [^aeiou] COMP
PFX BE nu takni [^aeiou] COMP
PFX BE ngå taknga [^aeiou] COMP
PFX BE ngo taknge [^aeiou] COMP
PFX BE ngu takngi [^aeiou] COMP
PFX BE på takpa [^aeiou] COMP
PFX BE po takpe [^aeiou] COMP
PFX BE pu takpi [^aeiou] COMP
PFX BE plå takpla [^aeiou] COMP
PFX BE plo takple [^aeiou] COMP
PFX BE plu takpli [^aeiou] COMP
PFX BE pro takpre [^aeiou] COMP
PFX BE ro takre [^aeiou] COMP
PFX BE ru takri [^aeiou] COMP
PFX BE så taksa [^aeiou] COMP
PFX BE so takse [^aeiou] COMP
PFX BE su taksi [^aeiou] COMP
PFX BE slu taksli [^aeiou] COMP
PFX BE tå takta [^aeiou] COMP
PFX BE to takte [^aeiou] COMP
PFX BE tu takti [^aeiou] COMP
PFX BE trå taktra [^aeiou] COMP
PFX BE tro taktre [^aeiou] COMP
PFX BE tru taktri [^aeiou] COMP
PFX BE yo takye [^aeiou] COMP
PFX BE yu takyi [^aeiou] COMP


#=======================================================================================================================
# [BF] PREFIX - LOOK IN A GIVEN DIRECTION  talak-
#~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
# Definition:  Look in a given direction.  Adds to direction words, triggers fronting
#=======================================================================================================================
PFX BF Y 76
PFX BF 0 talak . look.LAT		## will this over-generate? Need to force fronting... this might allow anything
PFX BF h talakk [aei] look.LAT
PFX BF o talake [^aeiou] look.LAT
PFX BF u talaki [^aeiou] look.LAT
PFX BF bå talakba [^aeiou] look.LAT
PFX BF bo talakbe [^aeiou] look.LAT
PFX BF bu talakbi [^aeiou] look.LAT
PFX BF blå talakbla [^aeiou] look.LAT
PFX BF blu talakbli [^aeiou] look.LAT
PFX BF brå talakbra [^aeiou] look.LAT
PFX BF bro talakbre [^aeiou] look.LAT
PFX BF bru talakbri [^aeiou] look.LAT
PFX BF chå talakcha [^aeiou] look.LAT
PFX BF cho talakche [^aeiou] look.LAT
PFX BF chu talakchi [^aeiou] look.LAT
PFX BF då talakda [^aeiou] look.LAT
PFX BF do talakde [^aeiou] look.LAT
PFX BF du talakdi [^aeiou] look.LAT
PFX BF få talakfa [^aeiou] look.LAT
PFX BF fo talakfe [^aeiou] look.LAT
PFX BF fu talakfi [^aeiou] look.LAT
PFX BF frå talakfra [^aeiou] look.LAT
PFX BF fru talakfri [^aeiou] look.LAT
PFX BF gå talakga [^aeiou] look.LAT
PFX BF go talakge [^aeiou] look.LAT
PFX BF gu talakgi [^aeiou] look.LAT
PFX BF glo talakgle [^aeiou] look.LAT
PFX BF grå talakgra [^aeiou] look.LAT
PFX BF gru talakgri [^aeiou] look.LAT
PFX BF hå talakka [^aeiou] look.LAT
PFX BF ho talakke [^aeiou] look.LAT
PFX BF hu talakki [^aeiou] look.LAT
PFX BF hai talakkai . look.LAT
PFX BF hao talakkao . look.LAT
PFX BF hoe talakkoe . look.LAT
PFX BF hou talakkou . look.LAT
PFX BF hue talakkue . look.LAT
PFX BF hui talakkui . look.LAT
PFX BF kå talakka [^aeiou] look.LAT
PFX BF ko talakke [^aeiou] look.LAT
PFX BF ku talakki [^aeiou] look.LAT
PFX BF klå talakkla [^aeiou] look.LAT
PFX BF kru talakkri [^aeiou] look.LAT
PFX BF lå talakla [^aeiou] look.LAT
PFX BF lo talakle [^aeiou] look.LAT
PFX BF lu talakli [^aeiou] look.LAT
PFX BF må talakma [^aeiou] look.LAT
PFX BF mo talakme [^aeiou] look.LAT
PFX BF mu talakmi [^aeiou] look.LAT
PFX BF nå talakna [^aeiou] look.LAT
PFX BF no talakne [^aeiou] look.LAT
PFX BF nu talakni [^aeiou] look.LAT
PFX BF ngå talaknga [^aeiou] look.LAT
PFX BF ngo talaknge [^aeiou] look.LAT
PFX BF ngu talakngi [^aeiou] look.LAT
PFX BF på talakpa [^aeiou] look.LAT
PFX BF po talakpe [^aeiou] look.LAT
PFX BF pu talakpi [^aeiou] look.LAT
PFX BF plå talakpla [^aeiou] look.LAT
PFX BF plo talakple [^aeiou] look.LAT
PFX BF plu talakpli [^aeiou] look.LAT
PFX BF pro talakpre [^aeiou] look.LAT
PFX BF ro talakre [^aeiou] look.LAT
PFX BF ru talakri [^aeiou] look.LAT
PFX BF så talaksa [^aeiou] look.LAT
PFX BF so talakse [^aeiou] look.LAT
PFX BF su talaksi [^aeiou] look.LAT
PFX BF slu talaksli [^aeiou] look.LAT
PFX BF tå talakta [^aeiou] look.LAT
PFX BF to talakte [^aeiou] look.LAT
PFX BF tu talakti [^aeiou] look.LAT
PFX BF trå talaktra [^aeiou] look.LAT
PFX BF tro talaktre [^aeiou] look.LAT
PFX BF tru talaktri [^aeiou] look.LAT
PFX BF yo talakye [^aeiou] look.LAT
PFX BF yu talakyi [^aeiou] look.LAT


#=======================================================================================================================
# [BG] PREFIX - IMPERATIVE MOOD  fan-
#~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
# Definition:  Affix for commands, requiring something to be done
#=======================================================================================================================
PFX BG Y 7
PFX BG 0 fan . IMP
PFX BG 0 fang [g] IMP
PFX BG 1 fang [k] IMP
PFX BG 1 fan [t] IMP
PFX BG 1 fañ [s] IMP
PFX BG 1 fam [fp] IMP
PFX BG ch fañ . IMP
